Missouri, session 2026, SB1117.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 537 and 573, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 537.043
and 573.570, to read as follows:
537.043. 1. This section and section 573.570 shall be
known and may be cited as "The Taylor Swift Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Consent", a freely given agreement to the
disclosure of an intimate digital depiction as provided by
subsection 5 of this section. Assent does not constitute
consent if:
(a) It is given by a depicted individual who lacks the
mental capacity to authorize the disclosure of an intimate
digital depiction and such mental incapacity is manifest or
known to a person who discloses the intimate digital
depiction;
(b) It is given by a depicted individual who by reason
of youth, mental disease or defect, intoxication, a drug-
induced state, or any other reason is manifestly unable, or
known by the person who discloses an intimate digital
depiction to be unable, to make a reasonable judgment as to

SB 1117 2
the nature or harmfulness of the disclosure of an intimate
digital depiction; or
(c) It is induced by force, duress, or deception;
(2) "Depicted individual", an individual who, as a
result of digitization or by means of digital manipulation,
appears in whole or in part in a digital depiction and who
is identifiable by virtue of the individual's face,
likeness, or other distinguishing characteristic, such as a
unique birthmark or other recognizable feature, or from
information displayed in connection with the digital
depiction;
(3) "Digital depiction", a realistic visual depiction
of an individual that has been created or altered using
digital manipulation;
(4) "Information content providers", any person or
entity that is responsible, in whole or in part, for the
creation or development of information provided through the
internet or any other interactive computer service;
(5) "Interactive computer service", any information
service, system or access software provider that provides or
enables computer access by multiple users to a computer
server, including specifically a service or system that
provides access to the internet and such systems operated or
services offered by libraries or educational institutions;
(6) "Intimate digital depiction", a digital depiction
of an individual that has been created or altered using
digital manipulation and that depicts:
(a) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or
postpubescent female nipple of the individual;
(b) The display or transfer of bodily sexual fluids:
a. Onto any part of the body of the individual; or
b. From the body of the individual; or

SB 1117 3
(c) The individual engaging in sexually explicit
conduct;
(7) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital,
oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, whether between
individuals of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic
area of any individual.
3. Except as provided in subsection 9 or 12 of this
section, a depicted individual who is under eighteen years
of age and is the subject of a digital depiction or a
depicted individual who is the subject of an intimate
digital depiction that is disclosed without the consent of
the depicted individual where such disclosure was made by a
person who knows, or recklessly disregards, that the
depicted individual has not consented to such disclosure may
bring a civil action against that other person in an
appropriate circuit court for relief as set forth in
subsections 6 and 7 of this section.
4. In the case of a depicted individual who is under
eighteen years of age or is incompetent, incapacitated, or
deceased, the legal guardian of the depicted individual or
representative of the depicted individual's estate, another
family member, or any person appointed as suitable by the
court may assume the depicted individual's rights under this
section, but in no event shall a defendant be named as such
representative or guardian of the depicted individual.
5. For the purposes of an action brought pursuant to
subsection 3 or 4 of this section:

SB 1117 4
(1) A depicted individual's consent to the creation of
the digital depiction shall not establish that the depicted
individual consented to the disclosure of the digital
depiction;
(2) Consent of disclosure of an intimate digital
depiction shall be deemed validly given only if:
(a) It is set forth in an agreement written in plain
language and signed knowingly and voluntarily by the
depicted individual; and
(b) The written agreement includes a general
description of the intimate digital depiction and, if
applicable, the audiovisual work into which the intimate
digital depiction will be incorporated.
6. In a civil action brought pursuant to this section,
a depicted individual may recover any of the following:
(1) An amount equal to the monetary gain made by the
defendant from the creation, development, or disclosure of
the digital depiction;
100 (2) Either of the following:
101 (a) The actual damages sustained by the depicted
102 individual as a result of the digital depiction, including
103 damages for emotional distress; or
104 (b) Liquidated damages in the amount of one hundred
105 fifty thousand dollars;
106 (3) Punitive damages; and
107 (4) The cost of the action, including reasonable
108 attorney's fees and court costs.
109 7. In a civil action brought pursuant to this section,
110 the court may, in addition to any other relief available at
111 law, order equitable relief, including a temporary
112 restraining order, a preliminary injunction, or a permanent

SB 1117 5
113 injunction ordering the defendant to cease the display or
114 disclosure of the digital depiction.
115 8. In ordering relief pursuant to this section, the
116 court may grant injunctive relief maintaining the
117 confidentiality of a plaintiff by using a pseudonym.
118 9. A depicted individual shall not bring an action for
119 relief under this section if:
120 (1) The disclosure was made in good faith:
121 (a) To or by a law enforcement officer or agency in
122 the course of reporting or investigating unlawful conduct; or
123 (b) As part of a legal proceeding;
124 (2) The disclosure was a matter of legitimate public
125 concern or public interest, except that the disclosure shall
126 not be considered a matter of legitimate public interest or
127 public concern solely because the depicted individual is a
128 public figure; or
129 (3) The disclosure reasonably intended to assist the
130 depicted individual.
131 10. A court may authorize an in camera proceeding
132 under this section.
133 11. It shall not be a defense to an action under this
134 section that there is a disclaimer stating that the digital
135 depiction was unauthorized or that the depicted individual
136 did not participate in the creation or development of the
137 digital depiction.
138 12. A provider of an interactive computer service
139 shall not be held liable in an action brought pursuant to
140 this section for:
141 (1) Any action voluntarily taken in good faith to
142 restrict access to or availability of digital depictions; or

SB 1117 6
143 (2) Any action taken to enable or make available to
144 information content providers or other persons the technical
145 means to restrict access to digital depictions.
573.570. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Depicted individual", an individual who, as a
result of digitization or by means of digital manipulation,
appears in whole or in part in a digital depiction and who
is identifiable by virtue of the individual's face,
likeness, or other distinguishing characteristic, such as a
unique birthmark or other recognizable feature, or from
information displayed in connection with the digital
depiction;
(2) "Digital depiction", a realistic visual depiction
of an individual that has been created or altered using
digital manipulation;
(3) "Information content providers", any person or
entity that is responsible, in whole or in part, for the
creation or development of information provided through the
internet or any other interactive computer service;
(4) "Interactive computer service", any information
service, system or access software provider that provides or
enables computer access by multiple users to a computer
server, including specifically a service or system that
provides access to the internet and such systems operated or
services offered by libraries or educational institutions;
(5) "Intimate digital depiction", a digital depiction
of an individual that has been created or altered using
digital manipulation and that depicts:
(a) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or
postpubescent female nipple of the individual;
(b) The display or transfer of bodily sexual fluids:

SB 1117 7
a. Onto any part of the body of the individual; or
b. From the body of the individual; or
(c) The individual engaging in sexually explicit
conduct;
(6) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital,
oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, whether between
persons of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic
area of any individual.
2. A person commits the offense of disclosure of a
digital depiction if the person discloses, or threatens to
disclose:
(1) A digital depiction of a depicted individual who
is under the age of eighteen; or
(2) An intimate digital depiction:
(a) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm,
or cause substantial harm to the finances or reputation of
the depicted individual; or
(b) With the actual knowledge that or reckless
disregard for whether such disclosure or threatened
disclosure will cause physical, emotional, reputational, or
economic harm to the depicted individual.
3. (1) A violation of subsection 2 of this section
shall be a class E felony.
(2) A violation of subsection 2 of this section shall
be a class C felony if:
(a) The violation is a second or other subsequent
violation of subsection 2 of this section; or

SB 1117 8
(b) The violation is such that the digital depiction
could be reasonably expected to:
a. Affect the conduct of any administrative,
legislative, or judicial proceeding of a federal, state,
local, or tribal government agency, including the
administration of an election or the conduct of foreign
relations; or
b. Facilitate violence.
4. It shall not be a defense to the offense of
disclosure of a digital depiction as provided by this
section that there is a disclaimer stating that the digital
depiction was unauthorized or that the depicted individual
did not participate in the creation or development of the
digital depiction.
5. For the purposes of this section, a provider of an
interactive computer service shall not have committed the
offense of disclosure of a digital depiction due to:
(1) Any action voluntarily taken in good faith to
restrict access to or availability of digital depictions; or
(2) Any action taken to enable or make available to
information content providers or other persons the technical
means to restrict access to digital depictions.
✓